Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,114
Violation of Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact; civil penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars per day of violation.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 37.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, see section 71-3522.